Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 9. Absentee Voter Law
[Repealed].

§§ 23-9-601 through 23-9-607.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-9-601 through23-9-607. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-301 to 3203-304; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 301-304]

§ 23-9-609.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 432, § 1, eff July 1, 1978.

§23-9-609. [Codes, 1942, § 3202-305; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 305]

§§ 23-9-611 and 23-9-613.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 343, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-9-611 through23-9-613. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-306, 3203-307; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 306, 307]